Hawaii statutes.
§454F-25 Nonprofit organizations; mortgage
loan originators. (a) An employee who performs
mortgage loan originator activities for a nonprofit organization is exempt from
registration and licensure as a mortgage loan originator; provided that:

(1) The employee's actions are part of the employee's
duties as an employee of the nonprofit organization;

(2) The employee only provides mortgage loan
originator services with respect to residential mortgage loans with terms
favorable to the borrower; and

(3) The nonprofit organization registers with NMLS.

(b) The commissioner shall periodically
examine the books and activities of nonprofit organizations as defined in
section 454F-1 and shall revoke an organization's registration as a nonprofit
organization with NMLS if the nonprofit organization fails to meet the
requirements to be a nonprofit organization.

(c) In determining whether a residential
mortgage loan has terms favorable to the borrower, the commissioner shall
examine:

(1) The interest rate that the home loan would carry;

(2) The charges that are imposed on the borrower for
origination, application, closing, and other costs;

(3) Whether the mortgage includes any predatory
characteristics;

(4) The borrower's ability to repay the loan; and

(5) The term of the mortgage. [L 2012, c 252, pt of
§1; am L 2014, c 9, §7 and c 198, §11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next